Illinois, session 104th, SB242.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Sections 1-160 and 14-152.1 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/1-160)7    (Text of Section from P.A. 102-719)8    Sec. 1-160. Provisions applicable to new hires. 9    (a) The provisions of this Section apply to a person who, 10on or after January 1, 2011, first becomes a member or a 11participant under any reciprocal retirement system or pension 12fund established under this Code, other than a retirement 13system or pension fund established under Article 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 147, 15, or 18 of this Code, notwithstanding any other provision 15of this Code to the contrary, but do not apply to any 16self-managed plan established under this Code or to any 17participant of the retirement plan established under Section 1822-101; except that this Section applies to a person who 19elected to establish alternative credits by electing in 20writing after January 1, 2011, but before August 8, 2011, 21under Section 7-145.1 of this Code. Notwithstanding anything 22to the contrary in this Section, for purposes of this Section, 23a person who is a Tier 1 regular employee as defined in Section   SB0242- 2 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b17-109.4 of this Code or who participated in a retirement 2system under Article 15 prior to January 1, 2011 shall be 3deemed a person who first became a member or participant prior 4to January 1, 2011 under any retirement system or pension fund 5subject to this Section. The changes made to this Section by 6Public Act 98-596 are a clarification of existing law and are 7intended to be retroactive to January 1, 2011 (the effective 8date of Public Act 96-889), notwithstanding the provisions of 9Section 1-103.1 of this Code.10    This Section does not apply to a person who first becomes a 11noncovered employee under Article 14 on or after the 12implementation date of the plan created under Section 1-161 13for that Article, unless that person elects under subsection 14(b) of Section 1-161 to instead receive the benefits provided 15under this Section and the applicable provisions of that 16Article.17    This Section does not apply to a person who first becomes a 18member or participant under Article 16 on or after the 19implementation date of the plan created under Section 1-161 20for that Article, unless that person elects under subsection 21(b) of Section 1-161 to instead receive the benefits provided 22under this Section and the applicable provisions of that 23Article.24    This Section does not apply to a person who elects under 25subsection (c-5) of Section 1-161 to receive the benefits 26under Section 1-161.   SB0242- 3 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b1    This Section does not apply to a person who first becomes a 2member or participant of an affected pension fund on or after 6 3months after the resolution or ordinance date, as defined in 4Section 1-162, unless that person elects under subsection (c) 5of Section 1-162 to receive the benefits provided under this 6Section and the applicable provisions of the Article under 7which he or she is a member or participant. 8    (b) "Final average salary" means, except as otherwise 9provided in this subsection, the average monthly (or annual) 10salary obtained by dividing the total salary or earnings 11calculated under the Article applicable to the member or 12participant during the 96 consecutive months (or 8 consecutive 13years) of service within the last 120 months (or 10 years) of 14service in which the total salary or earnings calculated under 15the applicable Article was the highest by the number of months 16(or years) of service in that period. For the purposes of a 17person who first becomes a member or participant of any 18retirement system or pension fund to which this Section 19applies on or after January 1, 2011, in this Code, "final 20average salary" shall be substituted for the following:21        (1) (Blank).22        (2) In Articles 8, 9, 10, 11, and 12, "highest average 23    annual salary for any 4 consecutive years within the last 24    10 years of service immediately preceding the date of 25    withdrawal". 26        (3) In Article 13, "average final salary".   SB0242- 4 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b1        (4) In Article 14, "final average compensation". 2        (5) In Article 17, "average salary". 3        (6) In Section 22-207, "wages or salary received by 4    him at the date of retirement or discharge". 5    A member of the Teachers' Retirement System of the State 6of Illinois who retires on or after June 1, 2021 and for whom 7the 2020-2021 school year is used in the calculation of the 8member's final average salary shall use the higher of the 9following for the purpose of determining the member's final 10average salary:11        (A) the amount otherwise calculated under the first 12    paragraph of this subsection; or13        (B) an amount calculated by the Teachers' Retirement 14    System of the State of Illinois using the average of the 15    monthly (or annual) salary obtained by dividing the total 16    salary or earnings calculated under Article 16 applicable 17    to the member or participant during the 96 months (or 8 18    years) of service within the last 120 months (or 10 years) 19    of service in which the total salary or earnings 20    calculated under the Article was the highest by the number 21    of months (or years) of service in that period.22    (b-5) Beginning on January 1, 2011, for all purposes under 23this Code (including without limitation the calculation of 24benefits and employee contributions), the annual earnings, 25salary, or wages (based on the plan year) of a member or 26participant to whom this Section applies shall not exceed   SB0242- 5 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b1$106,800; however, that amount shall annually thereafter be 2increased by the lesser of (i) 3% of that amount, including all 3previous adjustments, or (ii) one-half the annual unadjusted 4percentage increase (but not less than zero) in the consumer 5price index-u for the 12 months ending with the September 6preceding each November 1, including all previous adjustments.7    For the purposes of this Section, "consumer price index-u" 8means the index published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of 9the United States Department of Labor that measures the 10average change in prices of goods and services purchased by 11all urban consumers, United States city average, all items, 121982-84 = 100. The new amount resulting from each annual 13adjustment shall be determined by the Public Pension Division 14of the Department of Insurance and made available to the 15boards of the retirement systems and pension funds by November 161 of each year. 17    (b-10) Beginning on January 1, 2024, for all purposes 18under this Code (including, without limitation, the 19calculation of benefits and employee contributions), the 20annual earnings, salary, or wages (based on the plan year) of a 21member or participant under Article 9 to whom this Section 22applies shall include an annual earnings, salary, or wage cap 23that tracks the Social Security wage base. Maximum annual 24earnings, wages, or salary shall be the annual contribution 25and benefit base established for the applicable year by the 26Commissioner of the Social Security Administration under the   SB0242- 6 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b1federal Social Security Act. 2    However, in no event shall the annual earnings, salary, or 3wages for the purposes of this Article and Article 9 exceed any 4limitation imposed on annual earnings, salary, or wages under 5Section 1-117. Under no circumstances shall the maximum amount 6of annual earnings, salary, or wages be greater than the 7amount set forth in this subsection (b-10) as a result of 8reciprocal service or any provisions regarding reciprocal 9services, nor shall the Fund under Article 9 be required to pay 10any refund as a result of the application of this maximum 11annual earnings, salary, and wage cap. 12    Nothing in this subsection (b-10) shall cause or otherwise 13result in any retroactive adjustment of any employee 14contributions. Nothing in this subsection (b-10) shall cause 15or otherwise result in any retroactive adjustment of 16disability or other payments made between January 1, 2011 and 17January 1, 2024. 18    (c) A member or participant is entitled to a retirement 19annuity upon written application if he or she has attained age 2067 (age 65, with respect to service under Article 12 that is 21subject to this Section, for a member or participant under 22Article 12 who first becomes a member or participant under 23Article 12 on or after January 1, 2022 or who makes the 24election under item (i) of subsection (d-15) of this Section) 25and has at least 10 years of service credit and is otherwise 26eligible under the requirements of the applicable Article.   SB0242- 7 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b1    A member or participant who has attained age 62 (age 60, 2with respect to service under Article 12 that is subject to 3this Section, for a member or participant under Article 12 who 4first becomes a member or participant under Article 12 on or 5after January 1, 2022 or who makes the election under item (i) 6of subsection (d-15) of this Section) and has at least 10 years 7of service credit and is otherwise eligible under the 8requirements of the applicable Article may elect to receive 9the lower retirement annuity provided in subsection (d) of 10this Section. 11    (c-5) A person who first becomes a member or a participant 12subject to this Section on or after July 6, 2017 (the effective 13date of Public Act 100-23), notwithstanding any other 14provision of this Code to the contrary, is entitled to a 15retirement annuity under Article 8 or Article 11 upon written 16application if he or she has attained age 65 and has at least 1710 years of service credit and is otherwise eligible under the 18requirements of Article 8 or Article 11 of this Code, 19whichever is applicable. 20    (d) The retirement annuity of a member or participant who 21is retiring after attaining age 62 (age 60, with respect to 22service under Article 12 that is subject to this Section, for a 23member or participant under Article 12 who first becomes a 24member or participant under Article 12 on or after January 1, 252022 or who makes the election under item (i) of subsection 26(d-15) of this Section) with at least 10 years of service   SB0242- 8 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b1credit shall be reduced by one-half of 1% for each full month 2that the member's age is under age 67 (age 65, with respect to 3service under Article 12 that is subject to this Section, for a 4member or participant under Article 12 who first becomes a 5member or participant under Article 12 on or after January 1, 62022 or who makes the election under item (i) of subsection 7(d-15) of this Section).8    (d-5) The retirement annuity payable under Article 8 or 9Article 11 to an eligible person subject to subsection (c-5) 10of this Section who is retiring at age 60 with at least 10 11years of service credit shall be reduced by one-half of 1% for 12each full month that the member's age is under age 65. 13    (d-10) Each person who first became a member or 14participant under Article 8 or Article 11 of this Code on or 15after January 1, 2011 and prior to July 6, 2017 (the effective 16date of Public Act 100-23) shall make an irrevocable election 17either:18        (i) to be eligible for the reduced retirement age 19    provided in subsections (c-5) and (d-5) of this Section, 20    the eligibility for which is conditioned upon the member 21    or participant agreeing to the increases in employee 22    contributions for age and service annuities provided in 23    subsection (a-5) of Section 8-174 of this Code (for 24    service under Article 8) or subsection (a-5) of Section 25    11-170 of this Code (for service under Article 11); or 26        (ii) to not agree to item (i) of this subsection   SB0242- 9 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b1    (d-10), in which case the member or participant shall 2    continue to be subject to the retirement age provisions in 3    subsections (c) and (d) of this Section and the employee 4    contributions for age and service annuity as provided in 5    subsection (a) of Section 8-174 of this Code (for service 6    under Article 8) or subsection (a) of Section 11-170 of 7    this Code (for service under Article 11). 8    The election provided for in this subsection shall be made 9between October 1, 2017 and November 15, 2017. A person 10subject to this subsection who makes the required election 11shall remain bound by that election. A person subject to this 12subsection who fails for any reason to make the required 13election within the time specified in this subsection shall be 14deemed to have made the election under item (ii). 15    (d-15) Each person who first becomes a member or 16participant under Article 12 on or after January 1, 2011 and 17prior to January 1, 2022 shall make an irrevocable election 18either: 19        (i) to be eligible for the reduced retirement age 20    specified in subsections (c) and (d) of this Section, the 21    eligibility for which is conditioned upon the member or 22    participant agreeing to the increase in employee 23    contributions for service annuities specified in 24    subsection (b) of Section 12-150; or25        (ii) to not agree to item (i) of this subsection 26    (d-15), in which case the member or participant shall not   SB0242- 10 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b1    be eligible for the reduced retirement age specified in 2    subsections (c) and (d) of this Section and shall not be 3    subject to the increase in employee contributions for 4    service annuities specified in subsection (b) of Section 5    12-150. 6    The election provided for in this subsection shall be made 7between January 1, 2022 and April 1, 2022. A person subject to 8this subsection who makes the required election shall remain 9bound by that election. A person subject to this subsection 10who fails for any reason to make the required election within 11the time specified in this subsection shall be deemed to have 12made the election under item (ii). 13    (e) Any retirement annuity or supplemental annuity shall 14be subject to annual increases on the January 1 occurring 15either on or after the attainment of age 67 (age 65, with 16respect to service under Article 12 that is subject to this 17Section, for a member or participant under Article 12 who 18first becomes a member or participant under Article 12 on or 19after January 1, 2022 or who makes the election under item (i) 20of subsection (d-15); and beginning on July 6, 2017 (the 21effective date of Public Act 100-23), age 65 with respect to 22service under Article 8 or Article 11 for eligible persons 23who: (i) are subject to subsection (c-5) of this Section; or 24(ii) made the election under item (i) of subsection (d-10) of 25this Section) or the first anniversary of the annuity start 26date, whichever is later. Each annual increase shall be   SB0242- 11 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b1calculated at 3% or one-half the annual unadjusted percentage 2increase (but not less than zero) in the consumer price 3index-u for the 12 months ending with the September preceding 4each November 1, whichever is less, of the originally granted 5retirement annuity. If the annual unadjusted percentage change 6in the consumer price index-u for the 12 months ending with the 7September preceding each November 1 is zero or there is a 8decrease, then the annuity shall not be increased. 9    For the purposes of Section 1-103.1 of this Code, the 10changes made to this Section by Public Act 102-263 are 11applicable without regard to whether the employee was in 12active service on or after August 6, 2021 (the effective date 13of Public Act 102-263). 14    For the purposes of Section 1-103.1 of this Code, the 15changes made to this Section by Public Act 100-23 are 16applicable without regard to whether the employee was in 17active service on or after July 6, 2017 (the effective date of 18Public Act 100-23). 19    (f) The initial survivor's or widow's annuity of an 20otherwise eligible survivor or widow of a retired member or 21participant who first became a member or participant on or 22after January 1, 2011 shall be in the amount of 66 2/3% of the 23retired member's or participant's retirement annuity at the 24date of death. In the case of the death of a member or 25participant who has not retired and who first became a member 26or participant on or after January 1, 2011, eligibility for a   SB0242- 12 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b1survivor's or widow's annuity shall be determined by the 2applicable Article of this Code. The initial benefit shall be 366 2/3% of the earned annuity without a reduction due to age. A 4child's annuity of an otherwise eligible child shall be in the 5amount prescribed under each Article if applicable. Any 6survivor's or widow's annuity shall be increased (1) on each 7January 1 occurring on or after the commencement of the 8annuity if the deceased member died while receiving a 9retirement annuity or (2) in other cases, on each January 1 10occurring after the first anniversary of the commencement of 11the annuity. Each annual increase shall be calculated at 3% or 12one-half the annual unadjusted percentage increase (but not 13less than zero) in the consumer price index-u for the 12 months 14ending with the September preceding each November 1, whichever 15is less, of the originally granted survivor's annuity. If the 16annual unadjusted percentage change in the consumer price 17index-u for the 12 months ending with the September preceding 18each November 1 is zero or there is a decrease, then the 19annuity shall not be increased. 20    (g) The benefits in Section 14-110 apply if the person is a 21fire fighter in the fire protection service of a department, a 22security employee of the Department of Corrections or the 23Department of Juvenile Justice, or a security employee of the 24Department of Innovation and Technology, as those terms are 25defined in subsection (b) and subsection (c) of Section 2614-110. A person who meets the requirements of this Section is   SB0242- 13 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b1entitled to an annuity calculated under the provisions of 2Section 14-110, in lieu of the regular or minimum retirement 3annuity, only if the person has withdrawn from service with 4not less than 20 years of eligible creditable service and has 5attained age 60, regardless of whether the attainment of age 660 occurs while the person is still in service. 7    (g-5) The benefits in Section 14-110 apply if the person 8is a State policeman, investigator for the Secretary of State, 9conservation police officer, investigator for the Department 10of Revenue or the Illinois Gaming Board, investigator for the 11Office of the Attorney General, Commerce Commission police 12officer, or arson investigator, as those terms are defined in 13subsection (b) and subsection (c) of Section 14-110. Except as 14otherwise provided in subsection (g-10) of this Section, a A 15person who meets the requirements of this Section is entitled 16to an annuity calculated under the provisions of Section 1714-110, in lieu of the regular or minimum retirement annuity, 18only if the person has withdrawn from service with not less 19than 20 years of eligible creditable service and has attained 20age 55, regardless of whether the attainment of age 55 occurs 21while the person is still in service. 22    (g-10) A person who (i) is subject to this Section, (ii) is 23employed as an investigator for the Secretary of State or as a 24conservation police officer on the effective date of this 25amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, (iii) has 26accrued not less than 10 years of credit for such service, and   SB0242- 14 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b1(iv) has attained age 60 shall be entitled to an annuity 2calculated under the provisions of Section 14-110, in lieu of 3a regular or minimum retirement annuity, notwithstanding that 4he or she has accrued less than 20 years of eligible creditable 5service. 6    (h) If a person who first becomes a member or a participant 7of a retirement system or pension fund subject to this Section 8on or after January 1, 2011 is receiving a retirement annuity 9or retirement pension under that system or fund and becomes a 10member or participant under any other system or fund created 11by this Code and is employed on a full-time basis, except for 12those members or participants exempted from the provisions of 13this Section under subsection (a) of this Section, then the 14person's retirement annuity or retirement pension under that 15system or fund shall be suspended during that employment. Upon 16termination of that employment, the person's retirement 17annuity or retirement pension payments shall resume and be 18recalculated if recalculation is provided for under the 19applicable Article of this Code.20    If a person who first becomes a member of a retirement 21system or pension fund subject to this Section on or after 22January 1, 2012 and is receiving a retirement annuity or 23retirement pension under that system or fund and accepts on a 24contractual basis a position to provide services to a 25governmental entity from which he or she has retired, then 26that person's annuity or retirement pension earned as an   SB0242- 15 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b1active employee of the employer shall be suspended during that 2contractual service. A person receiving an annuity or 3retirement pension under this Code shall notify the pension 4fund or retirement system from which he or she is receiving an 5annuity or retirement pension, as well as his or her 6contractual employer, of his or her retirement status before 7accepting contractual employment. A person who fails to submit 8such notification shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor and 9required to pay a fine of $1,000. Upon termination of that 10contractual employment, the person's retirement annuity or 11retirement pension payments shall resume and, if appropriate, 12be recalculated under the applicable provisions of this Code. 13    (i) (Blank). 14    (j) In the case of a conflict between the provisions of 15this Section and any other provision of this Code, the 16provisions of this Section shall control.17(Source: P.A. 101-610, eff. 1-1-20; 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 18102-210, eff. 1-1-22; 102-263, eff. 8-6-21; 102-719, eff. 195-6-22.) 20    (Text of Section from P.A. 102-813)21    Sec. 1-160. Provisions applicable to new hires. 22    (a) The provisions of this Section apply to a person who, 23on or after January 1, 2011, first becomes a member or a 24participant under any reciprocal retirement system or pension 25fund established under this Code, other than a retirement   SB0242- 16 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b1system or pension fund established under Article 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 27, 15, or 18 of this Code, notwithstanding any other provision 3of this Code to the contrary, but do not apply to any 4self-managed plan established under this Code or to any 5participant of the retirement plan established under Section 622-101; except that this Section applies to a person who 7elected to establish alternative credits by electing in 8writing after January 1, 2011, but before August 8, 2011, 9under Section 7-145.1 of this Code. Notwithstanding anything 10to the contrary in this Section, for purposes of this Section, 11a person who is a Tier 1 regular employee as defined in Section 127-109.4 of this Code or who participated in a retirement 13system under Article 15 prior to January 1, 2011 shall be 14deemed a person who first became a member or participant prior 15to January 1, 2011 under any retirement system or pension fund 16subject to this Section. The changes made to this Section by 17Public Act 98-596 are a clarification of existing law and are 18intended to be retroactive to January 1, 2011 (the effective 19date of Public Act 96-889), notwithstanding the provisions of 20Section 1-103.1 of this Code.21    This Section does not apply to a person who first becomes a 22noncovered employee under Article 14 on or after the 23implementation date of the plan created under Section 1-161 24for that Article, unless that person elects under subsection 25(b) of Section 1-161 to instead receive the benefits provided 26under this Section and the applicable provisions of that   SB0242- 17 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b1Article.2    This Section does not apply to a person who first becomes a 3member or participant under Article 16 on or after the 4implementation date of the plan created under Section 1-161 5for that Article, unless that person elects under subsection 6(b) of Section 1-161 to instead receive the benefits provided 7under this Section and the applicable provisions of that 8Article.9    This Section does not apply to a person who elects under 10subsection (c-5) of Section 1-161 to receive the benefits 11under Section 1-161. 12    This Section does not apply to a person who first becomes a 13member or participant of an affected pension fund on or after 6 14months after the resolution or ordinance date, as defined in 15Section 1-162, unless that person elects under subsection (c) 16of Section 1-162 to receive the benefits provided under this 17Section and the applicable provisions of the Article under 18which he or she is a member or participant. 19    (b) "Final average salary" means, except as otherwise 20provided in this subsection, the average monthly (or annual) 21salary obtained by dividing the total salary or earnings 22calculated under the Article applicable to the member or 23participant during the 96 consecutive months (or 8 consecutive 24years) of service within the last 120 months (or 10 years) of 25service in which the total salary or earnings calculated under 26the applicable Article was the highest by the number of months   SB0242- 18 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b1(or years) of service in that period. For the purposes of a 2person who first becomes a member or participant of any 3retirement system or pension fund to which this Section 4applies on or after January 1, 2011, in this Code, "final 5average salary" shall be substituted for the following:6        (1) (Blank).7        (2) In Articles 8, 9, 10, 11, and 12, "highest average 8    annual salary for any 4 consecutive years within the last 9    10 years of service immediately preceding the date of 10    withdrawal". 11        (3) In Article 13, "average final salary". 12        (4) In Article 14, "final average compensation". 13        (5) In Article 17, "average salary". 14        (6) In Section 22-207, "wages or salary received by 15    him at the date of retirement or discharge". 16    A member of the Teachers' Retirement System of the State 17of Illinois who retires on or after June 1, 2021 and for whom 18the 2020-2021 school year is used in the calculation of the 19member's final average salary shall use the higher of the 20following for the purpose of determining the member's final 21average salary:22        (A) the amount otherwise calculated under the first 23    paragraph of this subsection; or24        (B) an amount calculated by the Teachers' Retirement 25    System of the State of Illinois using the average of the 26    monthly (or annual) salary obtained by dividing the total   SB0242- 19 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b1    salary or earnings calculated under Article 16 applicable 2    to the member or participant during the 96 months (or 8 3    years) of service within the last 120 months (or 10 years) 4    of service in which the total salary or earnings 5    calculated under the Article was the highest by the number 6    of months (or years) of service in that period.7    (b-5) Beginning on January 1, 2011, for all purposes under 8this Code (including without limitation the calculation of 9benefits and employee contributions), the annual earnings, 10salary, or wages (based on the plan year) of a member or 11participant to whom this Section applies shall not exceed 12$106,800; however, that amount shall annually thereafter be 13increased by the lesser of (i) 3% of that amount, including all 14previous adjustments, or (ii) one-half the annual unadjusted 15percentage increase (but not less than zero) in the consumer 16price index-u for the 12 months ending with the September 17preceding each November 1, including all previous adjustments.18    For the purposes of this Section, "consumer price index-u" 19means the index published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of 20the United States Department of Labor that measures the 21average change in prices of goods and services purchased by 22all urban consumers, United States city average, all items, 231982-84 = 100. The new amount resulting from each annual 24adjustment shall be determined by the Public Pension Division 25of the Department of Insurance and made available to the 26boards of the retirement systems and pension funds by November   SB0242- 20 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b11 of each year. 2    (b-10) Beginning on January 1, 2024, for all purposes 3under this Code (including, without limitation, the 4calculation of benefits and employee contributions), the 5annual earnings, salary, or wages (based on the plan year) of a 6member or participant under Article 9 to whom this Section 7applies shall include an annual earnings, salary, or wage cap 8that tracks the Social Security wage base. Maximum annual 9earnings, wages, or salary shall be the annual contribution 10and benefit base established for the applicable year by the 11Commissioner of the Social Security Administration under the 12federal Social Security Act. 13    However, in no event shall the annual earnings, salary, or 14wages for the purposes of this Article and Article 9 exceed any 15limitation imposed on annual earnings, salary, or wages under 16Section 1-117. Under no circumstances shall the maximum amount 17of annual earnings, salary, or wages be greater than the 18amount set forth in this subsection (b-10) as a result of 19reciprocal service or any provisions regarding reciprocal 20services, nor shall the Fund under Article 9 be required to pay 21any refund as a result of the application of this maximum 22annual earnings, salary, and wage cap. 23    Nothing in this subsection (b-10) shall cause or otherwise 24result in any retroactive adjustment of any employee 25contributions. Nothing in this subsection (b-10) shall cause 26or otherwise result in any retroactive adjustment of   SB0242- 21 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b1disability or other payments made between January 1, 2011 and 2January 1, 2024. 3    (c) A member or participant is entitled to a retirement 4annuity upon written application if he or she has attained age 567 (age 65, with respect to service under Article 12 that is 6subject to this Section, for a member or participant under 7Article 12 who first becomes a member or participant under 8Article 12 on or after January 1, 2022 or who makes the 9election under item (i) of subsection (d-15) of this Section) 10and has at least 10 years of service credit and is otherwise 11eligible under the requirements of the applicable Article. 12    A member or participant who has attained age 62 (age 60, 13with respect to service under Article 12 that is subject to 14this Section, for a member or participant under Article 12 who 15first becomes a member or participant under Article 12 on or 16after January 1, 2022 or who makes the election under item (i) 17of subsection (d-15) of this Section) and has at least 10 years 18of service credit and is otherwise eligible under the 19requirements of the applicable Article may elect to receive 20the lower retirement annuity provided in subsection (d) of 21this Section. 22    (c-5) A person who first becomes a member or a participant 23subject to this Section on or after July 6, 2017 (the effective 24date of Public Act 100-23), notwithstanding any other 25provision of this Code to the contrary, is entitled to a 26retirement annuity under Article 8 or Article 11 upon written   SB0242- 22 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b1application if he or she has attained age 65 and has at least 210 years of service credit and is otherwise eligible under the 3requirements of Article 8 or Article 11 of this Code, 4whichever is applicable. 5    (d) The retirement annuity of a member or participant who 6is retiring after attaining age 62 (age 60, with respect to 7service under Article 12 that is subject to this Section, for a 8member or participant under Article 12 who first becomes a 9member or participant under Article 12 on or after January 1, 102022 or who makes the election under item (i) of subsection 11(d-15) of this Section) with at least 10 years of service 12credit shall be reduced by one-half of 1% for each full month 13that the member's age is under age 67 (age 65, with respect to 14service under Article 12 that is subject to this Section, for a 15member or participant under Article 12 who first becomes a 16member or participant under Article 12 on or after January 1, 172022 or who makes the election under item (i) of subsection 18(d-15) of this Section).19    (d-5) The retirement annuity payable under Article 8 or 20Article 11 to an eligible person subject to subsection (c-5) 21of this Section who is retiring at age 60 with at least 10 22years of service credit shall be reduced by one-half of 1% for 23each full month that the member's age is under age 65. 24    (d-10) Each person who first became a member or 25participant under Article 8 or Article 11 of this Code on or 26after January 1, 2011 and prior to July 6, 2017 (the effective   SB0242- 23 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b1date of Public Act 100-23) shall make an irrevocable election 2either:3        (i) to be eligible for the reduced retirement age 4    provided in subsections (c-5) and (d-5) of this Section, 5    the eligibility for which is conditioned upon the member 6    or participant agreeing to the increases in employee 7    contributions for age and service annuities provided in 8    subsection (a-5) of Section 8-174 of this Code (for 9    service under Article 8) or subsection (a-5) of Section 10    11-170 of this Code (for service under Article 11); or 11        (ii) to not agree to item (i) of this subsection 12    (d-10), in which case the member or participant shall 13    continue to be subject to the retirement age provisions in 14    subsections (c) and (d) of this Section and the employee 15    contributions for age and service annuity as provided in 16    subsection (a) of Section 8-174 of this Code (for service 17    under Article 8) or subsection (a) of Section 11-170 of 18    this Code (for service under Article 11). 19    The election provided for in this subsection shall be made 20between October 1, 2017 and November 15, 2017. A person 21subject to this subsection who makes the required election 22shall remain bound by that election. A person subject to this 23subsection who fails for any reason to make the required 24election within the time specified in this subsection shall be 25deemed to have made the election under item (ii). 26    (d-15) Each person who first becomes a member or   SB0242- 24 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b1participant under Article 12 on or after January 1, 2011 and 2prior to January 1, 2022 shall make an irrevocable election 3either: 4        (i) to be eligible for the reduced retirement age 5    specified in subsections (c) and (d) of this Section, the 6    eligibility for which is conditioned upon the member or 7    participant agreeing to the increase in employee 8    contributions for service annuities specified in 9    subsection (b) of Section 12-150; or10        (ii) to not agree to item (i) of this subsection 11    (d-15), in which case the member or participant shall not 12    be eligible for the reduced retirement age specified in 13    subsections (c) and (d) of this Section and shall not be 14    subject to the increase in employee contributions for 15    service annuities specified in subsection (b) of Section 16    12-150. 17    The election provided for in this subsection shall be made 18between January 1, 2022 and April 1, 2022. A person subject to 19this subsection who makes the required election shall remain 20bound by that election. A person subject to this subsection 21who fails for any reason to make the required election within 22the time specified in this subsection shall be deemed to have 23made the election under item (ii). 24    (e) Any retirement annuity or supplemental annuity shall 25be subject to annual increases on the January 1 occurring 26either on or after the attainment of age 67 (age 65, with   SB0242- 25 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b1respect to service under Article 12 that is subject to this 2Section, for a member or participant under Article 12 who 3first becomes a member or participant under Article 12 on or 4after January 1, 2022 or who makes the election under item (i) 5of subsection (d-15); and beginning on July 6, 2017 (the 6effective date of Public Act 100-23), age 65 with respect to 7service under Article 8 or Article 11 for eligible persons 8who: (i) are subject to subsection (c-5) of this Section; or 9(ii) made the election under item (i) of subsection (d-10) of 10this Section) or the first anniversary of the annuity start 11date, whichever is later. Each annual increase shall be 12calculated at 3% or one-half the annual unadjusted percentage 13increase (but not less than zero) in the consumer price 14index-u for the 12 months ending with the September preceding 15each November 1, whichever is less, of the originally granted 16retirement annuity. If the annual unadjusted percentage change 17in the consumer price index-u for the 12 months ending with the 18September preceding each November 1 is zero or there is a 19decrease, then the annuity shall not be increased. 20    For the purposes of Section 1-103.1 of this Code, the 21changes made to this Section by Public Act 102-263 are 22applicable without regard to whether the employee was in 23active service on or after August 6, 2021 (the effective date 24of Public Act 102-263). 25    For the purposes of Section 1-103.1 of this Code, the 26changes made to this Section by Public Act 100-23 are   SB0242- 26 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b1applicable without regard to whether the employee was in 2active service on or after July 6, 2017 (the effective date of 3Public Act 100-23). 4    (f) The initial survivor's or widow's annuity of an 5otherwise eligible survivor or widow of a retired member or 6participant who first became a member or participant on or 7after January 1, 2011 shall be in the amount of 66 2/3% of the 8retired member's or participant's retirement annuity at the 9date of death. In the case of the death of a member or 10participant who has not retired and who first became a member 11or participant on or after January 1, 2011, eligibility for a 12survivor's or widow's annuity shall be determined by the 13applicable Article of this Code. The initial benefit shall be 1466 2/3% of the earned annuity without a reduction due to age. A 15child's annuity of an otherwise eligible child shall be in the 16amount prescribed under each Article if applicable. Any 17survivor's or widow's annuity shall be increased (1) on each 18January 1 occurring on or after the commencement of the 19annuity if the deceased member died while receiving a 20retirement annuity or (2) in other cases, on each January 1 21occurring after the first anniversary of the commencement of 22the annuity. Each annual increase shall be calculated at 3% or 23one-half the annual unadjusted percentage increase (but not 24less than zero) in the consumer price index-u for the 12 months 25ending with the September preceding each November 1, whichever 26is less, of the originally granted survivor's annuity. If the   SB0242- 27 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b1annual unadjusted percentage change in the consumer price 2index-u for the 12 months ending with the September preceding 3each November 1 is zero or there is a decrease, then the 4annuity shall not be increased. 5    (g) The benefits in Section 14-110 apply only if the 6person is a State policeman, a fire fighter in the fire 7protection service of a department, a conservation police 8officer, an investigator for the Secretary of State, an arson 9investigator, a Commerce Commission police officer, 10investigator for the Department of Revenue or the Illinois 11Gaming Board, a security employee of the Department of 12Corrections or the Department of Juvenile Justice, or a 13security employee of the Department of Innovation and 14Technology, as those terms are defined in subsection (b) and 15subsection (c) of Section 14-110. Except as otherwise provided 16in subsection (g-10) of this Section, a A person who meets the 17requirements of this Section is entitled to an annuity 18calculated under the provisions of Section 14-110, in lieu of 19the regular or minimum retirement annuity, only if the person 20has withdrawn from service with not less than 20 years of 21eligible creditable service and has attained age 60, 22regardless of whether the attainment of age 60 occurs while 23the person is still in service. 24    (g-10) A person who (i) is subject to this Section, (ii) is 25employed as an investigator for the Secretary of State or as a 26conservation police officer on the effective date of this   SB0242- 28 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b1amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, (iii) has 2accrued not less than 10 years of credit for such service, and 3(iv) has attained age 60 shall be entitled to an annuity 4calculated under the provisions of Section 14-110, in lieu of 5a regular or minimum retirement annuity, notwithstanding that 6he or she has accrued less than 20 years of eligible creditable 7service. 8    (h) If a person who first becomes a member or a participant 9of a retirement system or pension fund subject to this Section 10on or after January 1, 2011 is receiving a retirement annuity 11or retirement pension under that system or fund and becomes a 12member or participant under any other system or fund created 13by this Code and is employed on a full-time basis, except for 14those members or participants exempted from the provisions of 15this Section under subsection (a) of this Section, then the 16person's retirement annuity or retirement pension under that 17system or fund shall be suspended during that employment. Upon 18termination of that employment, the person's retirement 19annuity or retirement pension payments shall resume and be 20recalculated if recalculation is provided for under the 21applicable Article of this Code.22    If a person who first becomes a member of a retirement 23system or pension fund subject to this Section on or after 24January 1, 2012 and is receiving a retirement annuity or 25retirement pension under that system or fund and accepts on a 26contractual basis a position to provide services to a   SB0242- 29 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b1governmental entity from which he or she has retired, then 2that person's annuity or retirement pension earned as an 3active employee of the employer shall be suspended during that 4contractual service. A person receiving an annuity or 5retirement pension under this Code shall notify the pension 6fund or retirement system from which he or she is receiving an 7annuity or retirement pension, as well as his or her 8contractual employer, of his or her retirement status before 9accepting contractual employment. A person who fails to submit 10such notification shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor and 11required to pay a fine of $1,000. Upon termination of that 12contractual employment, the person's retirement annuity or 13retirement pension payments shall resume and, if appropriate, 14be recalculated under the applicable provisions of this Code. 15    (i) (Blank). 16    (j) In the case of a conflict between the provisions of 17this Section and any other provision of this Code, the 18provisions of this Section shall control.19(Source: P.A. 101-610, eff. 1-1-20; 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 20102-210, eff. 1-1-22; 102-263, eff. 8-6-21; 102-813, eff. 215-13-22.) 22    (Text of Section from P.A. 102-956)23    Sec. 1-160. Provisions applicable to new hires. 24    (a) The provisions of this Section apply to a person who, 25on or after January 1, 2011, first becomes a member or a   SB0242- 30 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b1participant under any reciprocal retirement system or pension 2fund established under this Code, other than a retirement 3system or pension fund established under Article 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 47, 15, or 18 of this Code, notwithstanding any other provision 5of this Code to the contrary, but do not apply to any 6self-managed plan established under this Code or to any 7participant of the retirement plan established under Section 822-101; except that this Section applies to a person who 9elected to establish alternative credits by electing in 10writing after January 1, 2011, but before August 8, 2011, 11under Section 7-145.1 of this Code. Notwithstanding anything 12to the contrary in this Section, for purposes of this Section, 13a person who is a Tier 1 regular employee as defined in Section 147-109.4 of this Code or who participated in a retirement 15system under Article 15 prior to January 1, 2011 shall be 16deemed a person who first became a member or participant prior 17to January 1, 2011 under any retirement system or pension fund 18subject to this Section. The changes made to this Section by 19Public Act 98-596 are a clarification of existing law and are 20intended to be retroactive to January 1, 2011 (the effective 21date of Public Act 96-889), notwithstanding the provisions of 22Section 1-103.1 of this Code.23    This Section does not apply to a person who first becomes a 24noncovered employee under Article 14 on or after the 25implementation date of the plan created under Section 1-161 26for that Article, unless that person elects under subsection   SB0242- 31 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b1(b) of Section 1-161 to instead receive the benefits provided 2under this Section and the applicable provisions of that 3Article.4    This Section does not apply to a person who first becomes a 5member or participant under Article 16 on or after the 6implementation date of the plan created under Section 1-161 7for that Article, unless that person elects under subsection 8(b) of Section 1-161 to instead receive the benefits provided 9under this Section and the applicable provisions of that 10Article.11    This Section does not apply to a person who elects under 12subsection (c-5) of Section 1-161 to receive the benefits 13under Section 1-161. 14    This Section does not apply to a person who first becomes a 15member or participant of an affected pension fund on or after 6 16months after the resolution or ordinance date, as defined in 17Section 1-162, unless that person elects under subsection (c) 18of Section 1-162 to receive the benefits provided under this 19Section and the applicable provisions of the Article under 20which he or she is a member or participant. 21    (b) "Final average salary" means, except as otherwise 22provided in this subsection, the average monthly (or annual) 23salary obtained by dividing the total salary or earnings 24calculated under the Article applicable to the member or 25participant during the 96 consecutive months (or 8 consecutive 26years) of service within the last 120 months (or 10 years) of   SB0242- 32 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b1service in which the total salary or earnings calculated under 2the applicable Article was the highest by the number of months 3(or years) of service in that period. For the purposes of a 4person who first becomes a member or participant of any 5retirement system or pension fund to which this Section 6applies on or after January 1, 2011, in this Code, "final 7average salary" shall be substituted for the following:8        (1) (Blank).9        (2) In Articles 8, 9, 10, 11, and 12, "highest average 10    annual salary for any 4 consecutive years within the last 11    10 years of service immediately preceding the date of 12    withdrawal". 13        (3) In Article 13, "average final salary". 14        (4) In Article 14, "final average compensation". 15        (5) In Article 17, "average salary". 16        (6) In Section 22-207, "wages or salary received by 17    him at the date of retirement or discharge". 18    A member of the Teachers' Retirement System of the State 19of Illinois who retires on or after June 1, 2021 and for whom 20the 2020-2021 school year is used in the calculation of the 21member's final average salary shall use the higher of the 22following for the purpose of determining the member's final 23average salary:24        (A) the amount otherwise calculated under the first 25    paragraph of this subsection; or26        (B) an amount calculated by the Teachers' Retirement   SB0242- 33 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b1    System of the State of Illinois using the average of the 2    monthly (or annual) salary obtained by dividing the total 3    salary or earnings calculated under Article 16 applicable 4    to the member or participant during the 96 months (or 8 5    years) of service within the last 120 months (or 10 years) 6    of service in which the total salary or earnings 7    calculated under the Article was the highest by the number 8    of months (or years) of service in that period.9    (b-5) Beginning on January 1, 2011, for all purposes under 10this Code (including without limitation the calculation of 11benefits and employee contributions), the annual earnings, 12salary, or wages (based on the plan year) of a member or 13participant to whom this Section applies shall not exceed 14$106,800; however, that amount shall annually thereafter be 15increased by the lesser of (i) 3% of that amount, including all 16previous adjustments, or (ii) one-half the annual unadjusted 17percentage increase (but not less than zero) in the consumer 18price index-u for the 12 months ending with the September 19preceding each November 1, including all previous adjustments.20    For the purposes of this Section, "consumer price index-u" 21means the index published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of 22the United States Department of Labor that measures the 23average change in prices of goods and services purchased by 24all urban consumers, United States city average, all items, 251982-84 = 100. The new amount resulting from each annual 26adjustment shall be determined by the Public Pension Division   SB0242- 34 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b1of the Department of Insurance and made available to the 2boards of the retirement systems and pension funds by November 31 of each year. 4    (b-10) Beginning on January 1, 2024, for all purposes 5under this Code (including, without limitation, the 6calculation of benefits and employee contributions), the 7annual earnings, salary, or wages (based on the plan year) of a 8member or participant under Article 9 to whom this Section 9applies shall include an annual earnings, salary, or wage cap 10that tracks the Social Security wage base. Maximum annual 11earnings, wages, or salary shall be the annual contribution 12and benefit base established for the applicable year by the 13Commissioner of the Social Security Administration under the 14federal Social Security Act. 15    However, in no event shall the annual earnings, salary, or 16wages for the purposes of this Article and Article 9 exceed any 17limitation imposed on annual earnings, salary, or wages under 18Section 1-117. Under no circumstances shall the maximum amount 19of annual earnings, salary, or wages be greater than the 20amount set forth in this subsection (b-10) as a result of 21reciprocal service or any provisions regarding reciprocal 22services, nor shall the Fund under Article 9 be required to pay 23any refund as a result of the application of this maximum 24annual earnings, salary, and wage cap. 25    Nothing in this subsection (b-10) shall cause or otherwise 26result in any retroactive adjustment of any employee   SB0242- 35 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b1contributions. Nothing in this subsection (b-10) shall cause 2or otherwise result in any retroactive adjustment of 3disability or other payments made between January 1, 2011 and 4January 1, 2024. 5    (c) A member or participant is entitled to a retirement 6annuity upon written application if he or she has attained age 767 (age 65, with respect to service under Article 12 that is 8subject to this Section, for a member or participant under 9Article 12 who first becomes a member or participant under 10Article 12 on or after January 1, 2022 or who makes the 11election under item (i) of subsection (d-15) of this Section) 12and has at least 10 years of service credit and is otherwise 13eligible under the requirements of the applicable Article. 14    A member or participant who has attained age 62 (age 60, 15with respect to service under Article 12 that is subject to 16this Section, for a member or participant under Article 12 who 17first becomes a member or participant under Article 12 on or 18after January 1, 2022 or who makes the election under item (i) 19of subsection (d-15) of this Section) and has at least 10 years 20of service credit and is otherwise eligible under the 21requirements of the applicable Article may elect to receive 22the lower retirement annuity provided in subsection (d) of 23this Section. 24    (c-5) A person who first becomes a member or a participant 25subject to this Section on or after July 6, 2017 (the effective 26date of Public Act 100-23), notwithstanding any other   SB0242- 36 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b1provision of this Code to the contrary, is entitled to a 2retirement annuity under Article 8 or Article 11 upon written 3application if he or she has attained age 65 and has at least 410 years of service credit and is otherwise eligible under the 5requirements of Article 8 or Article 11 of this Code, 6whichever is applicable. 7    (d) The retirement annuity of a member or participant who 8is retiring after attaining age 62 (age 60, with respect to 9service under Article 12 that is subject to this Section, for a 10member or participant under Article 12 who first becomes a 11member or participant under Article 12 on or after January 1, 122022 or who makes the election under item (i) of subsection 13(d-15) of this Section) with at least 10 years of service 14credit shall be reduced by one-half of 1% for each full month 15that the member's age is under age 67 (age 65, with respect to 16service under Article 12 that is subject to this Section, for a 17member or participant under Article 12 who first becomes a 18member or participant under Article 12 on or after January 1, 192022 or who makes the election under item (i) of subsection 20(d-15) of this Section).21    (d-5) The retirement annuity payable under Article 8 or 22Article 11 to an eligible person subject to subsection (c-5) 23of this Section who is retiring at age 60 with at least 10 24years of service credit shall be reduced by one-half of 1% for 25each full month that the member's age is under age 65. 26    (d-10) Each person who first became a member or   SB0242- 37 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b1participant under Article 8 or Article 11 of this Code on or 2after January 1, 2011 and prior to July 6, 2017 (the effective 3date of Public Act 100-23) shall make an irrevocable election 4either:5        (i) to be eligible for the reduced retirement age 6    provided in subsections (c-5) and (d-5) of this Section, 7    the eligibility for which is conditioned upon the member 8    or participant agreeing to the increases in employee 9    contributions for age and service annuities provided in 10    subsection (a-5) of Section 8-174 of this Code (for 11    service under Article 8) or subsection (a-5) of Section 12    11-170 of this Code (for service under Article 11); or 13        (ii) to not agree to item (i) of this subsection 14    (d-10), in which case the member or participant shall 15    continue to be subject to the retirement age provisions in 16    subsections (c) and (d) of this Section and the employee 17    contributions for age and service annuity as provided in 18    subsection (a) of Section 8-174 of this Code (for service 19    under Article 8) or subsection (a) of Section 11-170 of 20    this Code (for service under Article 11). 21    The election provided for in this subsection shall be made 22between October 1, 2017 and November 15, 2017. A person 23subject to this subsection who makes the required election 24shall remain bound by that election. A person subject to this 25subsection who fails for any reason to make the required 26election within the time specified in this subsection shall be   SB0242- 38 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b1deemed to have made the election under item (ii). 2    (d-15) Each person who first becomes a member or 3participant under Article 12 on or after January 1, 2011 and 4prior to January 1, 2022 shall make an irrevocable election 5either: 6        (i) to be eligible for the reduced retirement age 7    specified in subsections (c) and (d) of this Section, the 8    eligibility for which is conditioned upon the member or 9    participant agreeing to the increase in employee 10    contributions for service annuities specified in 11    subsection (b) of Section 12-150; or12        (ii) to not agree to item (i) of this subsection 13    (d-15), in which case the member or participant shall not 14    be eligible for the reduced retirement age specified in 15    subsections (c) and (d) of this Section and shall not be 16    subject to the increase in employee contributions for 17    service annuities specified in subsection (b) of Section 18    12-150. 19    The election provided for in this subsection shall be made 20between January 1, 2022 and April 1, 2022. A person subject to 21this subsection who makes the required election shall remain 22bound by that election. A person subject to this subsection 23who fails for any reason to make the required election within 24the time specified in this subsection shall be deemed to have 25made the election under item (ii). 26    (e) Any retirement annuity or supplemental annuity shall   SB0242- 39 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b1be subject to annual increases on the January 1 occurring 2either on or after the attainment of age 67 (age 65, with 3respect to service under Article 12 that is subject to this 4Section, for a member or participant under Article 12 who 5first becomes a member or participant under Article 12 on or 6after January 1, 2022 or who makes the election under item (i) 7of subsection (d-15); and beginning on July 6, 2017 (the 8effective date of Public Act 100-23), age 65 with respect to 9service under Article 8 or Article 11 for eligible persons 10who: (i) are subject to subsection (c-5) of this Section; or 11(ii) made the election under item (i) of subsection (d-10) of 12this Section) or the first anniversary of the annuity start 13date, whichever is later. Each annual increase shall be 14calculated at 3% or one-half the annual unadjusted percentage 15increase (but not less than zero) in the consumer price 16index-u for the 12 months ending with the September preceding 17each November 1, whichever is less, of the originally granted 18retirement annuity. If the annual unadjusted percentage change 19in the consumer price index-u for the 12 months ending with the 20September preceding each November 1 is zero or there is a 21decrease, then the annuity shall not be increased. 22    For the purposes of Section 1-103.1 of this Code, the 23changes made to this Section by Public Act 102-263 are 24applicable without regard to whether the employee was in 25active service on or after August 6, 2021 (the effective date 26of Public Act 102-263).   SB0242- 40 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b1    For the purposes of Section 1-103.1 of this Code, the 2changes made to this Section by Public Act 100-23 are 3applicable without regard to whether the employee was in 4active service on or after July 6, 2017 (the effective date of 5Public Act 100-23). 6    (f) The initial survivor's or widow's annuity of an 7otherwise eligible survivor or widow of a retired member or 8participant who first became a member or participant on or 9after January 1, 2011 shall be in the amount of 66 2/3% of the 10retired member's or participant's retirement annuity at the 11date of death. In the case of the death of a member or 12participant who has not retired and who first became a member 13or participant on or after January 1, 2011, eligibility for a 14survivor's or widow's annuity shall be determined by the 15applicable Article of this Code. The initial benefit shall be 1666 2/3% of the earned annuity without a reduction due to age. A 17child's annuity of an otherwise eligible child shall be in the 18amount prescribed under each Article if applicable. Any 19survivor's or widow's annuity shall be increased (1) on each 20January 1 occurring on or after the commencement of the 21annuity if the deceased member died while receiving a 22retirement annuity or (2) in other cases, on each January 1 23occurring after the first anniversary of the commencement of 24the annuity. Each annual increase shall be calculated at 3% or 25one-half the annual unadjusted percentage increase (but not 26less than zero) in the consumer price index-u for the 12 months   SB0242- 41 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b1ending with the September preceding each November 1, whichever 2is less, of the originally granted survivor's annuity. If the 3annual unadjusted percentage change in the consumer price 4index-u for the 12 months ending with the September preceding 5each November 1 is zero or there is a decrease, then the 6annuity shall not be increased. 7    (g) The benefits in Section 14-110 apply only if the 8person is a State policeman, a fire fighter in the fire 9protection service of a department, a conservation police 10officer, an investigator for the Secretary of State, an 11investigator for the Office of the Attorney General, an arson 12investigator, a Commerce Commission police officer, 13investigator for the Department of Revenue or the Illinois 14Gaming Board, a security employee of the Department of 15Corrections or the Department of Juvenile Justice, or a 16security employee of the Department of Innovation and 17Technology, as those terms are defined in subsection (b) and 18subsection (c) of Section 14-110. Except as otherwise provided 19in subsection (g-10) of this Section, a A person who meets the 20requirements of this Section is entitled to an annuity 21calculated under the provisions of Section 14-110, in lieu of 22the regular or minimum retirement annuity, only if the person 23has withdrawn from service with not less than 20 years of 24eligible creditable service and has attained age 60, 25regardless of whether the attainment of age 60 occurs while 26the person is still in service.   SB0242- 42 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b1    (g-10) A person who (i) is subject to this Section, (ii) is 2employed as an investigator for the Secretary of State or as a 3conservation police officer on the effective date of this 4amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, (iii) has 5accrued not less than 10 years of credit for such service, and 6(iv) has attained age 60 shall be entitled to an annuity 7calculated under the provisions of Section 14-110, in lieu of 8a regular or minimum retirement annuity, notwithstanding that 9he or she has accrued less than 20 years of eligible creditable 10service. 11    (h) If a person who first becomes a member or a participant 12of a retirement system or pension fund subject to this Section 13on or after January 1, 2011 is receiving a retirement annuity 14or retirement pension under that system or fund and becomes a 15member or participant under any other system or fund created 16by this Code and is employed on a full-time basis, except for 17those members or participants exempted from the provisions of 18this Section under subsection (a) of this Section, then the 19person's retirement annuity or retirement pension under that 20system or fund shall be suspended during that employment. Upon 21termination of that employment, the person's retirement 22annuity or retirement pension payments shall resume and be 23recalculated if recalculation is provided for under the 24applicable Article of this Code.25    If a person who first becomes a member of a retirement 26system or pension fund subject to this Section on or after   SB0242- 43 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b1January 1, 2012 and is receiving a retirement annuity or 2retirement pension under that system or fund and accepts on a 3contractual basis a position to provide services to a 4governmental entity from which he or she has retired, then 5that person's annuity or retirement pension earned as an 6active employee of the employer shall be suspended during that 7contractual service. A person receiving an annuity or 8retirement pension under this Code shall notify the pension 9fund or retirement system from which he or she is receiving an 10annuity or retirement pension, as well as his or her 11contractual employer, of his or her retirement status before 12accepting contractual employment. A person who fails to submit 13such notification shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor and 14required to pay a fine of $1,000. Upon termination of that 15contractual employment, the person's retirement annuity or 16retirement pension payments shall resume and, if appropriate, 17be recalculated under the applicable provisions of this Code. 18    (i) (Blank). 19    (j) In the case of a conflict between the provisions of 20this Section and any other provision of this Code, the 21provisions of this Section shall control.22(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-210, eff. 1-1-22; 23102-263, eff. 8-6-21; 102-956, eff. 5-27-22; 103-529, eff. 248-11-23.) 25    (40 ILCS 5/14-152.1)  SB0242- 44 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b1    Sec. 14-152.1. Application and expiration of new benefit 2increases.3    (a) As used in this Section, "new benefit increase" means 4an increase in the amount of any benefit provided under this 5Article, or an expansion of the conditions of eligibility for 6any benefit under this Article, that results from an amendment 7to this Code that takes effect after June 1, 2005 (the 8effective date of Public Act 94-4). "New benefit increase", 9however, does not include any benefit increase resulting from 10the changes made to Article 1 or this Article by Public Act 1196-37, Public Act 100-23, Public Act 100-587, Public Act 12100-611, Public Act 101-10, Public Act 101-610, Public Act 13102-210, Public Act 102-856, Public Act 102-956, or this 14amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly or this 15amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly. 16    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code or 17any subsequent amendment to this Code, every new benefit 18increase is subject to this Section and shall be deemed to be 19granted only in conformance with and contingent upon 20compliance with the provisions of this Section. 21    (c) The Public Act enacting a new benefit increase must 22identify and provide for payment to the System of additional 23funding at least sufficient to fund the resulting annual 24increase in cost to the System as it accrues.25    Every new benefit increase is contingent upon the General 26Assembly providing the additional funding required under this   SB0242- 45 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b1subsection. The Commission on Government Forecasting and 2Accountability shall analyze whether adequate additional 3funding has been provided for the new benefit increase and 4shall report its analysis to the Public Pension Division of 5the Department of Insurance. A new benefit increase created by 6a Public Act that does not include the additional funding 7required under this subsection is null and void. If the Public 8Pension Division determines that the additional funding 9provided for a new benefit increase under this subsection is 10or has become inadequate, it may so certify to the Governor and 11the State Comptroller and, in the absence of corrective action 12by the General Assembly, the new benefit increase shall expire 13at the end of the fiscal year in which the certification is 14made. 15    (d) Every new benefit increase shall expire 5 years after 16its effective date or on such earlier date as may be specified 17in the language enacting the new benefit increase or provided 18under subsection (c). This does not prevent the General 19Assembly from extending or re-creating a new benefit increase 20by law.21    (e) Except as otherwise provided in the language creating 22the new benefit increase, a new benefit increase that expires 23under this Section continues to apply to persons who applied 24and qualified for the affected benefit while the new benefit 25increase was in effect and to the affected beneficiaries and 26alternate payees of such persons, but does not apply to any   SB0242- 46 -LRB104 03145 RPS 13166 b1other person, including, without limitation, a person who 2continues in service after the expiration date and did not 3apply and qualify for the affected benefit while the new 4benefit increase was in effect.5(Source: P.A. 101-10, eff. 6-5-19; 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 6101-610, eff. 1-1-20; 102-210, eff. 7-30-21; 102-856, eff. 71-1-23; 102-956, eff. 5-27-22.) 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.